Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5578.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:

SECTION 1. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-11.4. Internet access rates for seniors.
(a) For purposes of this section, "Internet" means collectively the myriad of computer and
telecommunications facilities, including equipment and operating software, that comprise the
interconnected worldwide network of networks that employ the transmission control
protocol/Internet protocol, or any predecessor or successor protocols, to such protocol, to
communicate information of all kinds by wire or radio.
(b) Effective January 1, 2026, providers of access to the Internet shall not increase rates for
persons sixty-two (62) years or older for connection services to the Internet.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002116
========